Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB13.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Department for Medicaid Services shall administer the state's Medicaid
program under a fee-for-service model, Medicaid managed care model, or other
Medicaid delivery system model as permitted under federal law.
(2) If at any time on or after January 1, 2026, the Department for Medicaid Services
chooses to utilize a Medicaid managed care model for the administration of any
part of the state's Medicaid program, the Department for Medicaid Services shall
not award a contract for the delivery of Medicaid services to more than three (3)
Medicaid managed care organizations or other entities seeking to provide
Medicaid benefits under this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the administration of the Medicaid program
under more than one (1) delivery system model.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, Department for Medicaid Services shall procure new
Medicaid managed care contracts in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A and Section 1 of
this Act. Contracts procured under this section shall have an effective date no later than
January 1, 2027.
Page 1 of 1
SB001310.100 - 995 - XXXX 2/18/2025 4:44 PM GA